Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of Lading:
General Obligations.

Sec. 45.07.401.
Irregularities in issue of receipt or bill or conduct of issuer.

The obligations imposed by this chapter on an issuer apply to a document of title even if

the document does not comply with the requirements of this chapter or another statute, a regulation, or another rule of law regarding its issuance, form, or content;

the issuer violated laws regulating the conduct of the issuer’s business;

the goods covered by the document were owned by the bailee when the document was issued; or

the person issuing the document is not a warehouse but the document purports to be a warehouse receipt.

History.

(§ 7.401 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 62 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the introductory language, substituted “apply to a document of title even if” for “apply to a document of title regardless of the fact that”; in (1), substituted “does” for “may” following “the document”, substituted “another statute, a regulation, or another rule of law regarding its issuance” for “of any other law or regulation regarding its issue”; in (2), deleted “may have” following “the issuer”; in (3), substituted “when the document was issued” for “at the time the document was issued”; rewrote (4), which read, “the person issuing the document does not come within the definition of warehouseman if it purports to be a warehouse receipt”.

Sec. 45.07.402.
Duplicate document of title; overissue.

A duplicate or another document of title purporting to cover goods already represented by an outstanding document of the same issuer does not confer a right in the goods, except as provided in the case of tangible bills of lading in a set of parts, overissue of documents for fungible goods, substitutes for lost, stolen, or destroyed documents, or substitute documents issued under AS

45.07.115

. The issuer is liable for damages caused by the issuer’s overissue or failure to identify a duplicate document by a conspicuous notation.

History.

(§ 7.402 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 63 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the section, which read, “Duplicate receipt or bill; overissue. Neither a duplicate nor any other document of title purporting to cover goods already represented by an outstanding document of the same issuer confers a right in the goods, except as provided in the case of bills in a set, overissue of documents for fungible goods, and substitutes for lost, stolen, or destroyed documents.
But the issuer is liable for damages caused by the issuer’s overissue or failure to identify a duplicate document as such by conspicuous notation on its face.”

Sec. 45.07.403.
Obligation of bailee to deliver; excuse.

A bailee shall deliver the goods to a person entitled under a document of title if the person complies with (b) and (c) of this section, unless and to the extent that the bailee establishes any of the following:

delivery of the goods to a person whose receipt was rightful as against the claimant;

damage to or delay, loss, or destruction of the goods for which the bailee is not liable;

previous sale or other disposition of the goods in lawful enforcement of a lien or on a warehouse’s lawful termination of storage;

the exercise by a seller of its right to stop delivery under AS

45.02.705

or by a lessor of its right to stop delivery under AS

45.12.526

;

a diversion, reconsignment, or other disposition under AS

45.07.303

;

release, satisfaction, or another personal defense against the claimant; or

another lawful excuse.

A person claiming goods covered by a document of title shall satisfy the bailee’s lien if the bailee requests the person to satisfy the lien or if the bailee is prohibited by law from delivering the goods until the charges are paid.

Unless the person claiming the goods is a person against whom the document of title does not confer a right under AS

45.07.503(a)

,

the person claiming under a document shall surrender possession or control of an outstanding negotiable document covering the goods for cancellation or indication of partial deliveries; and

the bailee shall cancel the document or conspicuously indicate in the document the partial delivery, or the bailee is liable to a person to whom the document is duly negotiated.

[Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]

History.

(§ 7.403 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 64 — 66, 113 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “A bailee shall” for “The bailee must” preceding “deliver the goods to a person”; in (a)(3), substituted “a warehouse’s” for “warehouseman’s”; in (a)(4), added “or by a lessor of its right to stop delivery under AS

45.12.526

” at the end; in (a)(5), deleted “or tariff regulating this right” at the end; in (a)(6), substituted “another” for “any other fact affording a”; in (a)(7), substituted “another” for “any other”; in (b), substituted “document of title shall satisfy the bailee’s lien if the bailee requests the person to satisfy the lien” for “document of title must satisfy the bailee’s lien if the bailee so requests”; rewrote (c), which read, “Unless the person claiming is one against whom the document confers no right under AS

45.07.503(a)

, the person must surrender for cancellation or notation of partial deliveries an outstanding negotiable document covering the goods, and the bailee must cancel the document or conspicuously note the partial delivery on the document or be liable to a person to whom the document is duly negotiated.”; repealed (d), which read, “ ‘Person entitled under the document’ means holder in the case of a negotiable document, or the person to whom delivery is to be made by the terms of or under written instructions under a nonnegotiable document.”; made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.404.
No liability for good faith delivery under document of title.

A bailee who, in good faith, has received goods and delivered or otherwise disposed of the goods according to the terms of a document of title or under this chapter is not liable for the goods even if the person

from whom the bailee received the goods did not have authority to procure the document or to dispose of the goods; or

to whom the bailee delivered the goods did not have authority to receive the goods.

History.

(§ 7.404 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 67 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the section, which read, “No liability for good faith delivery pursuant to receipt or bill. A bailee who in good faith, including observance of reasonable commercial standards, has received goods and delivered or otherwise disposed of them according to the terms of the document of title or under this chapter is not liable for that disposal.
This rule applies even though the person from whom the bailee received the goods had no authority to procure the document or to dispose of the goods and even though the person to whom the bailee delivered the goods had no authority to receive them.”